Missouri, session 2026, SB1570.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 193.215, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 193.215,
to read as follows:
193.215. 1. A certificate or report registered
pursuant to sections 193.005 to 193.325 may be amended only
pursuant to the provisions of sections 193.005 to 193.325,
and regulations adopted by the department.
2. A certificate or report that is amended pursuant to
this section shall be marked "Amended" except as otherwise
provided in this section. The date of amendment and a
summary description of the evidence submitted in support of
the amendment shall be endorsed on or made part of the
record.
3. Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of a
court of competent jurisdiction changing the name of a
person born in this state and upon request of such person or
such person's parents, guardian, or legal representative,
the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to
show the new name. The court order shall include such facts
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1570 2
as are necessary to locate and identify the certificate of
birth of the person whose name is being changed.
4. When an applicant does not submit the minimum
documentation required in the regulations for amending a
vital record or when the state registrar has reasonable
cause to question the validity or adequacy of the
applicant's sworn statements or the documentary evidence,
and if the deficiencies are not corrected, the state
registrar shall not amend the vital record and shall advise
the applicant of the reason for this action and the
applicant's right of appeal to a court of competent
jurisdiction.
5. When a certificate or report is amended pursuant to
this section, the state registrar shall report the amendment
to any other custodians of the vital record and their record
shall be amended accordingly.
6. Upon written request of both parents and receipt of
a sworn acknowledgment of paternity notarized and signed by
both parents of a child born out of wedlock, the state
registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show such
paternity. The acknowledgment affidavit form shall be
developed by the state registrar and shall include the
minimum requirements prescribed by the secretary of the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to 42
U.S.C. Section 652(a)(7). The acknowledgment form shall
include provisions to allow the parents to change the
surname of the child and such surname shall be changed on
the birth record if the parents elect to change the child's
surname. The signature of the parents shall be notarized or
the signature shall be witnessed by at least two
disinterested adults whose signatures and addresses shall be
plainly written thereon. The form shall be accompanied by

SB 1570 3
oral notice, which may be provided through the use of video
or audio equipment, and written notice to the mother and
putative father of:
(1) The alternatives to, the legal consequences of,
and the rights and responsibilities that arise from signing
the acknowledgment;
(2) The benefits of having the child's paternity
established; and
(3) The availability of paternity establishment and
child support enforcement services. A rescission of
acknowledgment form shall be filed with the bureau of vital
records pursuant to section 210.823 to vacate the legal
finding of paternity. The bureau shall file all rescissions
and forward a copy of each to the family support division.
The birth record shall only be changed pursuant to this
subsection upon an order of the court or the family support
division.
7. The department shall offer voluntary paternity
establishment services.
8. Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of a
court of competent jurisdiction changing the name of a
person born in this state and upon request of such person or
such person's parents, guardian or legal representative, the
state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show
the new name.
9. [Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of a
court of competent jurisdiction indicating the sex of an
individual born in this state has been changed by surgical
procedure and that such individual's name has been changed,
the certificate of birth of such individual shall be
amended.] Upon receipt of a statement signed by a person
born in this state in which the person attests to a gender

SB 1570 4
identity other than that currently recorded on the birth
certificate, the state registrar shall amend the certificate
of birth to indicate a male, female, or X sex designation.
✓